Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.240

Teachers' insurance benefits—Payment of warrants.

Upon presentation to the state treasurer of a warrant issued by the treasurer and drawn for the purposes under RCW 44.04.230, the treasurer shall pay the amount necessary from appropriated funds. If sufficient funds have not been appropriated, the treasurer shall endorse the warrant and the warrant draws interest from the date of the endorsement until paid.

[ 1998 c 62 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 62: See note following RCW 44.04.230.